Utah statutes.
7-1-301.   Powers and duties of commissioner -- Rulemaking.
Without limiting the other powers, duties, and responsibilities specified in
this title, the commissioner has all the functions, powers, duties, and
responsibilities with respect to institutions, persons, or businesses subject
to the jurisdiction of the department contained in this title, including all
of the functions, powers, duties, and responsibilities described in
Subsections (1) through (15).
(1)  The commissioner may govern the administration and operation of the
department.
(2)  The commissioner may supervise the conduct, operation, management,
examination, and statements and reports of examinations of financial
institutions and other persons subject to the jurisdiction of the department.
(3) (a)  The commissioner may authorize a state chartered depository
institution to engage in any activity it could engage in, and to grant to that
institution all additional rights, powers, privileges, benefits, or immunities
it would possess, if it were chartered under the laws of the United States.
(b)  The commissioner may authorize a depository institution chartered by this
state to engage in any activity that a Utah branch of an out-of-state
depository institution of the same class can engage in, and to grant to the
Utah institution all additional rights, powers, privileges, benefits, or
immunities it needs to engage in the activity.
(c)  In granting authority under this Subsection (3), the commissioner shall
consider:
(i)  the need for competitive equality between institutions chartered by this
state and institutions operating in this state that are chartered by another
state or by the federal government; and
(ii)  the adverse effect on shareholders, members, depositors, and other
customers of financial institutions chartered by this state if equal power and
protection of those institutions, compared with federally chartered or out-of-
state institutions of the same class, are not promptly available.
(4)  The commissioner may safeguard the interest of shareholders, members,
depositors, and other customers of institutions and other persons subject to
the jurisdiction of the department.
(5) (a)  The commissioner may establish criteria consistent with this title to
be applied in granting applications for approval of:
(i)  a new institution;
(ii)  a new branch;
(iii)  the relocation of an office or branch;
(iv)  a merger;
(v)  a consolidation;
(vi)  a change in control of an institution or other person subject to the
jurisdiction of the department; and
(vii)  other applications specified in this title.
(b)  The criteria established under Subsection (5)(a) may not be applied to
make it more difficult for a state chartered institution to obtain approval of
an application than for a federally chartered institution in the same class to
obtain approval from the appropriate federal regulatory agency or
administrator.
(6) (a)  The commissioner may protect the privacy of the records of any
institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department pertaining to a
particular depositor or other customer of the institution.  Rules adopted
under this Subsection (6) shall be consistent with federal laws and
regulations applicable to the institution.
(b)  Any institution that consents to produce records or that is required to
produce records in compliance with a subpoena or other order of a court of
competent jurisdiction or in compliance with an order obtained pursuant to
Sections 7-1-1001 through 7-1-1007 shall be reimbursed for the cost of
retrieval and reproduction of the records by the party seeking the
information.  The commissioner may by rule establish the rates and conditions
under which reimbursement is made.
(7) (a)  The commissioner may classify all records kept by institutions
subject to the jurisdiction of the department and to prescribe the period for
which each class of records is retained.
(b)  Rules adopted under this Subsection (7) for any class of financial
institution shall be consistent with federal laws and regulations applicable
to the class.
(c)  Rules made under this Subsection (7) shall provide that:
(i)  An institution may dispose of any record after retaining it for the
period prescribed by the commissioner for retention of records of its class.
If an institution disposes of a record after the prescribed period, the
institution has no duty to produce it in any action or proceeding and is not
liable to any person by reason of that disposition.
(ii)  Any institution may keep records in its custody in the form of microfilm
or equivalent reproduction.  Any such reproduction shall have the same force
and effect as the original and shall be admissible into evidence as if it were
the original.
(d)  In adopting rules under this Subsection (7), the commissioner shall take
into consideration:
(i)  actions at law and administrative proceedings in which the production of
the records might be necessary or desirable;
(ii)  state and federal statutes of limitation applicable to the actions or
proceedings;
(iii)  the availability from other sources of information contained in these
records; and
(iv)  other matters the commissioner considers pertinent in formulating rules
that require institutions to retain their records for as short a period as
commensurate with the interest in having the records available of:
(A)  customers, members, depositors, and shareholders of the institutions; and
(B)  the people of this state.
(8) (a)  The commissioner may establish reasonable classes of depository and
other financial institutions including separate classes for:
(i)  savings and loan associations and related institutions;
(ii)  banks and related institutions;
(iii)  credit unions; and
(iv)  industrial banks.
(b)  If the restrictions or requirements the commissioner imposes are not more
stringent than those applicable under federal law or regulation to federally
chartered institutions of the same class, the commissioner may establish the
following for each class in a manner consistent with this title:
(i)  eligible classes and types of investments for the deposits and other
funds of those financial institutions;
(ii)  minimum standards, in amounts sufficient to protect depositors and other
creditors, for the amount and types of capital required to engage in the
business conducted by each class or to obtain a license or to establish a
branch or additional office of an institution of each class;
(iii)  eligible obligations, reserves, and other accounts to be included in
the computation of capital;
(iv)  minimum liquidity requirements for financial institutions within each
class in amounts sufficient to meet the demands of depositors and other
creditors for liquid funds;
(v)  limitations on the amount and type of borrowings by each class of
financial institution in relation to the amount of its capital and the
character and condition of its assets and its deposits and other liabilities;
(vi)  limitations on the amount and nature of loans and extensions of credit
to any person or related persons by each class of financial institution in
relation to the amount of its capital; and
(vii)  limitations on the amount and nature of loans and extensions of credit
by a financial institution or other person within each class to an executive
officer, director, or principal shareholder of:
(A)  the institution or other person;
(B)  any company of which the institution or other person is a subsidiary;
(C)  any subsidiary of the institution or other person;
(D)  any affiliate of the institution; and
(E)  a company controlled by an executive officer, director, or principal
shareholder of the institution.
(9)  The commissioner may define unfair trade practices of financial
institutions and other persons subject to the jurisdiction of the department
and to prohibit or restrict these practices.
(10)  The commissioner may establish reasonable standards to promote the fair
and truthful advertising of:
(a)  services offered by a financial institution;
(b)  the charges for the services advertised under Subsection (10)(a);
(c)  the interest or other compensation to be paid on deposits or any debt
instrument offered for sale by the institution;
(d)  the nature and extent of any:
(i)  insurance on deposits;
(ii)  savings accounts;
(iii)  share accounts;
(iv)  certificates of deposit;
(v)  time deposit accounts;
(vi)  NOW accounts;
(vii)  share draft accounts;
(viii)  transaction accounts; or
(ix)  any evidence of indebtedness issued, offered for sale, offered to sell
or sold by any financial institution or other person subject to the
jurisdiction of the department; and
(e)  the safety or financial soundness of any financial institution or other
person subject to the jurisdiction of the department.
(11)  The commissioner may define what constitutes an impairment of capital
for each class of financial institution or other person subject to the
jurisdiction of the department.
(12)  The commissioner may designate days on which depository institutions are
closed in accordance with Section 7-1-808.
(13)  The commissioner may regulate the issuance, advertising, offer for sale,
and sale of a security to the extent authorized by Section 7-1-503.
(14)  The commissioner may require the officers of any institution or other
person subject to the commissioner's jurisdiction to open and keep a standard
set of books, computer records, or both for the purpose of keeping accurate
and convenient records of the transactions and accounts of the institution in
a manner to enable the commissioner, supervisors, and department examiners to
readily ascertain the institution's true condition.  These requirements shall
be consistent with generally accepted accounting principles for financial
institutions.
(15)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner may adopt and issue rules consistent with the purposes
and provisions of this title, and may revise, amend, or repeal the rules
adopted.
